Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 8. Tobacco Use Policy

§ 140.
Tobacco use prohibited on public school grounds.

No person shall be permitted to use tobacco products or tobacco substitutes as defined in

7 V.S.A. § 1001

on public school grounds or at public school sponsored functions. Public school boards may adopt policies that include confiscation and appropriate referrals to law enforcement authorities.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1995, No. 52

, § 1;

1997, No. 58

, § 10;

2013, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2017, No. 74

, § 21.